Connecticut, session 2026, HB05032.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the
2 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, in section 1 of public act 25-168,
3 regarding the GENERAL FUND are amended to read as follows:
T1 2026-2027
T2 LEGISLATIVE
T3
T4 LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT
T5 Personal Services 64,296,079
T6 Other Expenses 24,954,131
T7 Equipment 3,295,000
T8 Flag Restoration 65,000
T9 Minor Capital Improvements 4,000,000
T10 Interim Salary/Caucus Offices 591,748
T11 Connecticut Academy of Science and [226,000] 276,000
Engineering
T12 Old State House 900,000
T13 Translators 150,000
T14 Wall of Fame 10,000
T15 Interstate Conference Fund 529,095
T16 New England Board of Higher Education 226,488
LCO 1 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T17 AGENCY TOTAL [99,243,541] 99,293,541
T18
T19 AUDITORS OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS
T20 Personal Services 16,701,328
T21 Other Expenses 451,727
T22 AGENCY TOTAL 17,153,055
T23
T24 COMMISSION ON WOMEN, CHILDREN,
SENIORS, EQUITY AND OPPORTUNITY
T25 Personal Services 1,227,933
T26 Other Expenses 60,000
T27 AGENCY TOTAL 1,287,933
T28
T29 GENERAL GOVERNMENT
T30
T31 GOVERNOR'S OFFICE
T32 Personal Services [3,983,704] 3,994,533
T33 Other Expenses 635,401
T34 National Governors' Association 121,522
T35 AGENCY TOTAL [4,740,627] 4,751,456
T36
T37 SECRETARY OF THE STATE
T38 Personal Services [5,402,637] 5,286,773
T39 Other Expenses [3,517,936] 5,127,936
T40 Commercial Recording Division 5,419,159
T41 Early Voting [1,320,000] 3,570,000
T42 Bridgeport Election Monitor 150,000
T43 AGENCY TOTAL [15,809,732] 19,553,868
T44
T45 LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR'S OFFICE
T46 Personal Services [865,598] 874,649
T47 Other Expenses 46,323
T48 AGENCY TOTAL [911,921] 920,972
T49
T50 ELECTIONS ENFORCEMENT
COMMISSION
T51 Elections Enforcement Commission [4,255,296] 4,280,767
T52
T53 OFFICE OF STATE ETHICS
LCO 2 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T54 Office of State Ethics [2,059,779] 2,238,902
T55
T56 FREEDOM OF INFORMATION
COMMISSION
T57 Freedom of Information Commission [2,283,813] 2,307,423
T58
T59 STATE TREASURER
T60 Personal Services [3,543,056] 3,552,107
T61 Other Expenses 359,854
T62 AGENCY TOTAL [3,902,910] 3,911,961
T63
T64 STATE COMPTROLLER
T65 Personal Services [30,478,063] 30,487,114
T66 Other Expenses 18,417,000
T67 AGENCY TOTAL [48,895,063] 48,904,114
T68
T69 DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SERVICES
T70 Personal Services [54,700,984] 54,871,282
T71 Other Expenses 4,617,358
T72 AGENCY TOTAL [59,318,342] 59,488,640
T73
T74 OFFICE OF GOVERNMENTAL
ACCOUNTABILITY
T75 [Other Expenses] [25,098]
T76 Child Fatality Review Panel 139,183
T77 Contracting Standards Board 859,334
T78 Judicial Review Council 191,511
T79 Judicial Selection Commission 117,678
T80 Office of the Child Advocate 1,032,892
T81 Office of the Victim Advocate 519,674
T82 Board of Firearms Permit Examiners 148,193
T83 Office of the Correction Ombuds [763,692] 1,019,274
T84 Office of the Educational Ombudsperson 180,000
T85 AGENCY TOTAL [3,977,255] 4,207,739
T86
T87 OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
T88 Personal Services [21,379,691] 22,631,714
T89 Other Expenses [3,305,422] 3,413,635
LCO 3 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T90 Automated Budget System and Data Base 20,438
Link
T91 Justice Assistance Grants 865,967
T92 Tax Relief For Elderly Renters 25,020,226
T93 Private Providers 156,000,000
T94 Reimbursement Property Tax - Disability 364,713
Exemption
T95 Distressed Municipalities 1,500,000
T96 Property Tax Relief Elderly Freeze Program [4,000] 2,000
T97 Property Tax Relief for Veterans [2,708,107] 1,708,107
T98 Municipal Restructuring 300,000
T99 Various Municipal Grants 899,000
T100 America250 250,000
T101 AGENCY TOTAL [211,468,564] 212,975,800
T102
T103 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS
T104 Personal Services [23,687,289] 23,802,446
T105 Other Expenses [4,106,113] 5,471,457
T106 SSMF Administration 560,345
T107 Veterans' Opportunity Pilot 245,047
T108 Veterans' Rally Point 512,764
T109 Burial Expenses 6,666
T110 Headstones [307,834] 207,834
T111 AGENCY TOTAL [29,426,058] 30,806,559
T112
T113 DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
T114 Personal Services 100,780,339
T115 Other Expenses [31,251,286] 31,881,302
T116 Loss Control Risk Management 88,003
T117 Employees' Review Board 32,611
T118 Refunds Of Collections 20,381
T119 Rents and Moving 4,136,035
T120 W. C. Administrator 5,562,120
T121 Claims Commissioner Operations 460,499
T122 State Insurance and Risk Mgmt Operations 21,830,588
T123 IT Services [67,732,158] 69,273,016
T124 Firefighters Fund 400,000
T125 State Properties Review Board 337,113
LCO 4 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T126 State Marshal Commission [365,556] 417,680
T127 [Office of the Claims Commissioner] [460,499]
T128 AGENCY TOTAL [232,996,689] 235,219,687
T129
T130 ATTORNEY GENERAL
T131 Personal Services [40,234,183] 41,093,234
T132 Other Expenses 1,054,810
T133 AGENCY TOTAL [41,288,993] 42,148,044
T134
T135 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
T136 Personal Services 58,219,053
T137 Other Expenses [5,102,201] 5,002,201
T138 Witness Protection [200,000] 300,000
T139 Training And Education 147,398
T140 Expert Witnesses 135,413
T141 Medicaid Fraud Control [1,509,942] 1,602,442
T142 Criminal Justice Commission 409
T143 Cold Case Unit 292,041
T144 Shooting Taskforce 1,427,286
T145 AGENCY TOTAL [67,033,743] 67,126,243
T146
T147 REGULATION AND PROTECTION
T148
T149 DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY SERVICES
AND PUBLIC PROTECTION
T150 Personal Services [180,361,731] 180,561,731
T151 Other Expenses [34,715,572] 45,032,873
T152 Fleet Purchase [7,782,053] 8,317,320
T153 Criminal Justice Information System 4,763,320
T154 CRISIS 1,800,000
T155 Law Enforcement Training Partnerships 2,050,000
T156 Cadet Program 947,411
T157 Fire Training School - Willimantic 242,176
T158 Maintenance of County Base Fire Radio 19,528
Network
T159 Maintenance of State-Wide Fire Radio 12,997
Network
T160 Police Association of Connecticut 172,353
T161 Connecticut State Firefighter's Association [176,625] 306,625
LCO 5 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T162 Fire Training School - Torrington 172,267
T163 Fire Training School - New Haven 108,364
T164 Fire Training School - Derby 50,639
T165 Fire Training School - Wolcott 171,162
T166 Fire Training School - Fairfield 127,501
T167 Fire Training School - Hartford 176,836
T168 Fire Training School - Middletown 70,970
T169 Fire Training School - Stamford 75,541
T170 Various Grants 2,477,000
T171 Volunteer Firefighter Training 140,000
T172 AGENCY TOTAL [233,189,635] 247,796,614
T173
T174 MILITARY DEPARTMENT
T175 Personal Services 3,305,492
T176 Other Expenses 2,144,823
T177 Honor Guards 561,600
T178 Veteran's Service Bonuses 379,500
T179 JEEP Program 338,600
T180 [Governor's Guards] [330,000]
T181 Governor's Foot Guards 10,000
T182 Governor's First Horse Guard 160,000
T183 Governor's Second Horse Guard 160,000
T184 AGENCY TOTAL 7,060,015
T185
T186 DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER
PROTECTION
T187 Personal Services [16,807,275] 17,257,473
T188 Other Expenses [757,940] 1,519,330
T189 Funeral Services Compensation 1,000,000
T190 AGENCY TOTAL [17,565,215] 19,776,803
T191
T192 LABOR DEPARTMENT
T193 Personal Services [17,911,298] 19,252,413
T194 Other Expenses [4,693,827] 7,123,827
T195 CETC Workforce 606,460
T196 Workforce Investment Act 29,938,610
T197 Job Funnels Projects 712,857
T198 Connecticut's Youth Employment Program 10,268,488
LCO 6 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T199 Jobs First Employment Services 13,173,620
T200 Apprenticeship Program [604,369] 763,254
T201 Connecticut Career Resource Network 152,112
T202 STRIVE 88,779
T203 Opportunities for Long Term Unemployed 5,121,184
T204 Second Chance Initiative 327,038
T205 Cradle To Career 100,000
T206 New Haven Jobs Funnel 750,000
T207 Manufacturing Pipeline Initiative [4,627,698] 6,627,698
T208 Domestic Workers Education and Training 400,000
Grant Program
T209 Various Grants 3,470,000
T210 AGENCY TOTAL [89,476,340] 98,876,340
T211
T212 COMMISSION ON HUMAN RIGHTS AND
OPPORTUNITIES
T213 Personal Services [8,768,241] 9,043,421
T214 Other Expenses [398,527] 428,719
T215 Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission 5,977
T216 AGENCY TOTAL [9,172,745] 9,478,117
T217
T218 CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
T219
T220 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
T221 Personal Services [4,713,414] 4,818,414
T222 Other Expenses [2,373,332] 693,332
T223 Senior Food Vouchers 518,418
T224 Dairy Farmer - Agriculture Sustainability 1,000,000
T225 WIC Coupon Program for Fresh Produce 247,938
T226 Various Grants 1,680,000
T227 AGENCY TOTAL [8,853,102] 8,958,102
T228
T229 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
T230 Personal Services [23,865,954] 24,250,567
T231 Other Expenses [1,602,261] 997,261
T232 Mosquito and Tick Control 284,240
T233 State Superfund Site Maintenance 399,577
T234 Laboratory Fees 122,565
LCO 7 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T235 Dam Maintenance 151,902
T236 Emergency Spill Response 7,657,024
T237 Solid Waste Management 4,078,312
T238 Underground Storage Tank 1,085,420
T239 Clean Air 4,449,309
T240 Environmental Conservation 4,893,567
T241 Environmental Quality 7,056,504
T242 Fish Hatcheries 3,004,540
T243 U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission 278,315
T244 Interstate Environmental Commission 3,333
T245 New England Interstate Water Pollution 26,554
Commission
T246 Northeast Interstate Forest Fire Compact 3,082
T247 Connecticut River Valley Flood Control 30,295
Commission
T248 Thames River Valley Flood Control 45,151
Commission
T249 Various Grants 605,000
T250 AGENCY TOTAL [59,037,905] 59,422,518
T251
T252 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
T253 Personal Services [9,842,148] 10,185,290
T254 Other Expenses 611,278
T255 Spanish-American Merchants Association 442,194
T256 Office of Military Affairs 181,521
T257 CCAT-CT Manufacturing Supply Chain 2,585,000
T258 Capital Region Development Authority 10,845,022
T259 Manufacturing Growth Initiative 178,133
T260 Hartford 2000 20,000
T261 Office of Workforce Strategy 1,303,046
T262 Black Business Alliance 442,194
T263 Hartford Economic Development 442,194
Corporation
T264 CONNSTEP 500,000
T265 Various Grants [20,176,930] 21,781,930
T266 MRDA 1,300,000
T267 AdvanceCT 2,000,000
T268 Futures Inc 85,000
T269 Forge City Works 300,000
LCO 8 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T270 CT Community Empowerment Foundation 100,000
T271 City Seed 300,000
T272 AGENCY TOTAL [51,654,660] 53,602,802
T273
T274 DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
T275 Personal Services [2,649,343] 2,901,351
T276 Other Expenses 157,210
T277 Elderly Rental Registry and Counselors 1,011,170
T278 Homeless Youth 3,235,121
T279 Outreach Services for Norwich [250,000] 500,000
T280 Subsidized Assisted Living Demonstration 3,402,000
T281 Congregate Facilities Operation Costs 12,864,700
T282 Elderly Congregate Rent Subsidy 2,172,786
T283 Housing/Homeless Services [114,398,923] 123,898,923
T284 Project Longevity - Housing 2,491,355
T285 Housing/Homeless Services - Municipality 692,651
T286 AGENCY TOTAL [143,325,259] 153,327,267
T287
T288 AGRICULTURAL EXPERIMENT STATION
T289 Personal Services 7,197,533
T290 Other Expenses 1,081,499
T291 Mosquito and Tick Disease Prevention 857,623
T292 Wildlife Disease Prevention 133,357
T293 AGENCY TOTAL 9,270,012
T294
T295 HEALTH
T296
T297 DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
T298 Personal Services [40,640,559] 43,237,915
T299 Other Expenses [8,939,228] 9,685,270
T300 Gun Violence Prevention 4,404,299
T301 Lung Cancer Detection and Referrals 479,137
T302 Pancreatic Cancer Screening 127,161
T303 Public Health Response 720,931
T304 Community Health Services [2,398,494] 1,898,494
T305 Rape Crisis 616,233
T306 Various Grants 634,000
T307 Local and District Departments of Health [8,213,916] 8,341,658
LCO 9 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T308 School Based Health Clinics [14,400,721] 14,843,721
T309 AGENCY TOTAL [80,940,679] 84,988,819
T310
T311 [OFFICE OF HEALTH STRATEGY]
T312 [Personal Services] [3,370,606]
T313 [Other Expenses] [1,170,255]
T314 [AGENCY TOTAL] [4,540,861]
T315
T316 OFFICE OF THE CHIEF MEDICAL
EXAMINER
T317 Personal Services 9,036,394
T318 Other Expenses 2,479,935
T319 Equipment 24,846
T320 Medicolegal Investigations 22,150
T321 AGENCY TOTAL 11,563,325
T322
T323 DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENTAL
SERVICES
T324 Personal Services 224,654,418
T325 Other Expenses 21,019,245
T326 Housing Supports and Services 1,400,000
T327 Family Support Grants 3,700,840
T328 Clinical Services [2,337,724] 2,437,724
T329 Behavioral Services Program 12,857,593
T330 Supplemental Payments for Medical Services 2,558,132
T331 ID Partnership Initiatives 2,528,138
T332 Emergency Placements 5,980,932
T333 Rent Subsidy Program 5,262,312
T334 Employment Opportunities and Day Services 407,451,072
T335 Community Residential Services 938,815,100
T336 AGENCY TOTAL [1,628,565,506] 1,628,665,506
T337
T338 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH
AND ADDICTION SERVICES
T339 Personal Services 257,078,417
T340 Other Expenses [37,617,895] 37,636,645
T341 Housing Supports and Services [29,716,445] 30,716,445
T342 Managed Service System [77,687,785] 84,312,785
T343 Legal Services 764,660
LCO 10 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T344 Connecticut Mental Health Center 9,229,406
T345 Professional Services 23,400,697
T346 Behavioral Health Recovery Services [26,407,864] 26,694,864
T347 Nursing Home Screening 652,784
T348 Young Adult Services 95,902,326
T349 TBI Community Services 9,443,717
T350 Behavioral Health Medications [8,170,754] 9,470,754
T351 Medicaid Adult Rehabilitation Option 4,419,683
T352 Discharge and Diversion Services [43,157,991] 46,382,991
T353 Home and Community Based Services [26,723,158] 27,413,158
T354 Nursing Home Contract 1,152,856
T355 Katie Blair House 17,016
T356 Forensic Services [11,544,887] 13,444,887
T357 Grants for Substance Abuse Services [37,103,118] 42,653,118
T358 Grants for Mental Health Services 77,117,159
T359 Employment Opportunities 9,873,631
T360 AGENCY TOTAL [787,182,249] 807,777,999
T361
T362 PSYCHIATRIC SECURITY REVIEW BOARD
T363 Personal Services 367,270
T364 Other Expenses 24,943
T365 AGENCY TOTAL 392,213
T366
T367 HUMAN SERVICES
T368
T369 DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES
T370 Personal Services [159,660,660] 163,210,138
T371 Other Expenses [168,068,200] 170,668,200
T372 Genetic Tests in Paternity Actions 81,906
T373 HUSKY B Program [32,760,000] 33,190,000
T374 Substance Use Disorder Waiver Reserve [18,370,000] 7,265,000
T375 Medicaid [3,950,330,000] 3,968,365,000
T376 Old Age Assistance [56,900,000] 62,600,000
T377 Aid To The Blind [657,800] 960,000
T378 Aid To The Disabled [56,020,000] 59,300,000
T379 Temporary Family Assistance - TANF [75,400,000] 54,000,000
T380 Emergency Assistance 1
T381 Food Stamp Training Expenses 9,341
LCO 11 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T382 DMHAS-Disproportionate Share 108,935,000
T383 Connecticut Home Care Program [51,180,000] 56,180,000
T384 Human Resource Development-Hispanic 1,070,348
Programs
T385 Safety Net Services 1,500,145
T386 Refunds Of Collections 89,965
T387 Services for Persons With Disabilities 309,661
T388 Nutrition Assistance 6,020,994
T389 State Administered General Assistance [19,000,000] 15,056,000
T390 Connecticut Children's Medical Center 13,138,737
T391 Community Services [10,992,162] 16,556,299
T392 Human Services Infrastructure Community 4,274,240
Action Program
T393 Teen Pregnancy Prevention 1,394,639
T394 Domestic Violence Shelters 8,650,381
T395 Hospital Supplemental Payments [778,300,000] 708,300,000
T396 [Regional Hospice of Western CT] [1,000,000]
T397 Teen Pregnancy Prevention - Municipality 98,281
T398 AGENCY TOTAL [5,524,212,461] 5,461,224,276
T399
T400 DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND
DISABILITY SERVICES
T401 Personal Services [8,626,272] 9,042,629
T402 Other Expenses [2,182,575] 1,422,575
T403 Educational Aid for Children - Blind or 5,036,360
Visually Impaired
T404 Employment Opportunities – Blind & 416,974
Disabled
T405 Vocational Rehabilitation - Disabled [7,895,382] 8,677,931
T406 Supplementary Relief and Services [97,251] 44,847
T407 Special Training for the Deaf Blind 264,045
T408 Connecticut Radio Information Service 70,194
T409 Independent Living Centers 1,025,528
T410 Programs for Senior Citizens [5,036,165] 6,296,165
T411 Elderly Nutrition [5,141,074] 5,294,406
T412 Communication Advocacy Network 200,000
T413 AGENCY TOTAL [35,991,820] 37,791,654
T414
T415 EDUCATION
T416
LCO 12 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T417 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
T418 Personal Services 18,557,641
T419 Other Expenses [28,295,963] 3,770,963
T420 Development of Mastery Exams Grades 4, 6, 10,571,192
and 8
T421 Primary Mental Health [335,288] 314,288
T422 Leadership, Education, Athletics in 312,211
Partnership (LEAP)
T423 Adult Education Action [169,534] 159,534
T424 Connecticut Writing Project 95,250
T425 CT Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs 1,000,000
T426 Sheff Settlement 18,721,292
T427 Parent Trust Fund Program [350,000] 600,000
T428 Commissioner's Network [9,869,398] 9,817,398
T429 Local Charter Schools 957,000
T430 Bridges to Success 27,000
T431 Talent Development [2,068,449] 4,468,449
T432 School-Based Diversion Initiative 900,000
T433 EdSight [1,140,690] 1,640,690
T434 Sheff Transportation 80,326,212
T435 Curriculum and Standards [4,215,782] 8,715,782
T436 Non-Sheff Transportation 14,275,787
T437 Aspiring Educators Scholarship Program [6,000,000] 4,500,000
T438 Dual Credit 6,000,000
T439 Local Food for Local Schools Incentive 3,430,000
Program
T440 Office of Dyslexia [680,000] 1,180,000
T441 Special Education Initiatives 3,300,000
T442 American School For The Deaf 12,357,514
T443 Regional Education Services [262,500] 254,500
T444 Family Resource Centers [7,000,000] 7,250,000
T445 Charter Schools [144,122,548] 148,686,141
T446 Child Nutrition State Match [2,354,000] 2,877,755
T447 Health Foods Initiative 4,151,463
T448 Various Grants 14,611,000
T449 Rose City Learning [159,000] 240,185
T450 SERC 2,000,000
T451 Teacher Residency RESC Alliance 750,000
T452 Vocational Agriculture [26,295,732] 26,132,180
LCO 13 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T453 Adult Education [25,953,382] 25,356,130
T454 Health and Welfare Services Pupils Private [6,447,702] 6,455,908
Schools
T455 Education Equalization Grants [2,456,935,081] 2,458,690,805
T456 Bilingual Education 3,832,260
T457 Priority School Districts 30,818,778
T458 Interdistrict Cooperation 1,537,500
T459 School Breakfast Program [2,158,900] 14,158,900
T460 Excess Cost - Student Based 221,119,782
T461 Open Choice Program 31,472,503
T462 Magnet Schools 344,345,603
T463 After School Program 5,750,695
T464 Extended School Hours 2,919,883
T465 School Accountability 3,412,207
T466 High Dosage Tutoring Grants 5,000,000
T467 Special Education and Expansion 30,000,000
Development
T468 High Quality Special Ed Incentives 9,900,000
T469 Learner Engagement and Attendance 7,000,000
Program
T470 School Based Behavioral Health Grants 5,000,000
T471 AGENCY TOTAL [3,593,605,722] 3,619,722,381
T472
T473 CONNECTICUT TECHNICAL EDUCATION
AND CAREER SYSTEM
T474 Personal Services [175,558,658] 177,213,906
T475 Other Expenses [31,957,461] 37,957,461
T476 AGENCY TOTAL [207,516,119] 215,171,367
T477
T478 OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
T479 Personal Services 9,926,912
T480 Other Expenses [8,294,731] 7,919,731
T481 Birth to Three [36,093,626] 38,493,626
T482 Evenstart 545,456
T483 2Gen - TANF [575,685] 672,390
T484 [Nurturing Families Network] [14,469,995]
T485 OEC Parent Cabinet 152,264
T486 Capitol Child Development Center 263,000
T487 CT Home Visiting System 14,469,995
LCO 14 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T488 Head Start Services 5,833,238
T489 Care4Kids TANF/CCDF 151,227,096
T490 Child Care Quality Enhancements 5,954,530
T491 Early Head Start-Child Care Partnership 1,500,000
T492 Early Care and Education 201,845,725
T493 Various Grants 875,000
T494 Smart Start 6,325,000
T495 AGENCY TOTAL [443,007,258] 446,003,963
T496
T497 STATE LIBRARY
T498 Personal Services 5,419,751
T499 Other Expenses [1,460,515] 772,336
T500 State-Wide Digital Library 1,709,210
T501 Interlibrary Loan Delivery Service 380,136
T502 Legal/Legislative Library Materials 674,540
T503 Library for the Blind 100,000
T504 Support Cooperating Library Service Units 124,402
T505 Various Grants 550,000
T506 Grants To Public Libraries 225,000
T507 Connecticard Payments 703,638
T508 AGENCY TOTAL [10,572,192] 10,659,013
T509
T510 OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION
T511 Personal Services 1,855,031
T512 Other Expenses [3,142,258] 731,175
T513 Minority Advancement Program 1,674,835
T514 National Service Act 320,151
T515 Minority Teacher Incentive Program 570,134
T516 CT Loan Reimbursement 6,000,000
T517 Kirklyn M. Kerr Program 150,000
T518 Roberta B. Willis Scholarship Fund 41,288,637
T519 Various Grants 2,361,083
T520 Health Care Adjunct Grant Program 260,000
T521 AGENCY TOTAL [55,111,046] 55,211,046
T522
T523 UNIVERSITY OF CONNECTICUT
T524 Operating Expenses [250,543,874] 249,423,874
T525 Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory 250,000
LCO 15 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T526 Institute for Municipal and Regional Policy 550,000
T527 UConn Veterans Program 250,000
T528 Health Services - Regional Campuses 1,400,000
T529 Puerto Rican Studies Initiative 500,000
T530 Completion Grants 6,600,000
T531 Student Success Software 4,000,000
T532 Various Grants 1,120,000
T533 AGENCY TOTAL [253,493,874] 264,093,874
T534
T535 UNIVERSITY OF CONNECTICUT HEALTH
CENTER
T536 Operating Expenses [136,673,524] 135,508,524
T537 AHEC 429,735
T538 Neuromodulation Treatment 2,000,000
T539 Various Grants 1,165,000
T540 AGENCY TOTAL 139,103,259
T541
T542 TEACHERS' RETIREMENT BOARD
T543 Personal Services 2,291,080
T544 Other Expenses 482,003
T545 Retirement Contributions - Normal Cost [299,800,000] 328,073,000
T546 Retirement Contributions - UAL [1,405,300,000] 1,403,546,000
T547 Retirees Health Service Cost 44,356,000
T548 Municipal Retiree Health Insurance Costs 8,840,000
T549 AGENCY TOTAL [1,761,069,083] 1,787,588,083
T550
T551 CONNECTICUT STATE COLLEGES AND
UNIVERSITIES
T552 Charter Oak State College [4,041,029] 3,541,029
T553 Community Tech College System 241,998,796
T554 Connecticut State University [201,697,946] 200,156,926
T555 Board of Regents [519,512] 1,619,512
T556 Developmental Services 10,190,984
T557 Outcomes-Based Funding Incentive 1,374,425
T558 O'Neill Chair 315,000
T559 Debt Free Community College [34,150,000] 36,450,000
T560 Expanded PACT 7,700,000
T561 Disabilities Study 250,000
T562 Various Grants 2,550,000
LCO 16 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T563 AGENCY TOTAL [502,237,692] 506,146,672
T564
T565 CORRECTIONS
T566
T567 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION
T568 Personal Services [470,144,513] 476,390,513
T569 Other Expenses [89,528,616] 99,528,616
T570 Inmate Medical Services [150,129,165] 154,329,165
T571 Board of Pardons and Paroles [6,822,490] 7,022,490
T572 STRIDE 80,181
T573 HITEC [644,174] 764,174
T574 Aid to Paroled and Discharged Inmates 3,000
T575 Legal Services To Prisoners 797,000
T576 Volunteer Services 87,725
T577 Community Support Services 47,566,468
T578 Reentry Centers 1,500,000
T579 AGENCY TOTAL [767,303,332] 788,069,332
T580
T581 DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND
FAMILIES
T582 Personal Services [303,233,500] 304,233,500
T583 Other Expenses [31,137,956] 35,837,956
T584 Family Support Services 1,064,233
T585 Differential Response System 9,367,256
T586 Regional Behavioral Health Consultation 1,838,167
T587 Community Care Coordination 8,957,944
T588 Health Assessment and Consultation 1,596,776
T589 Grants for Psychiatric Clinics for Children [17,880,105] 18,130,105
T590 Day Treatment Centers for Children 8,219,601
T591 Child Abuse and Neglect Intervention 9,988,016
T592 Community Based Prevention Programs 9,657,655
T593 Family Violence Outreach and Counseling 4,009,230
T594 Supportive Housing [21,180,221] 21,680,221
T595 No Nexus Special Education 2,452,640
T596 Family Preservation Services 7,242,683
T597 Substance Abuse Treatment [10,073,982] 11,708,982
T598 Child Welfare Support Services 2,854,163
T599 Board and Care for Children - Adoption 106,884,511
LCO 17 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T600 Board and Care for Children - Foster [123,521,818] 125,021,818
T601 Board and Care for Children - Short-term and [65,628,396] 69,628,396
Residential
T602 Individualized Family Supports [3,871,304] 4,021,304
T603 Community Kidcare 61,011,129
T604 Covenant to Care 185,911
T605 Various Grants 550,000
T606 Juvenile Review Boards 6,043,187
T607 Youth Transition and Success Programs [1,016,220] 1,266,220
T608 [Love146] [500,000]
T609 Youth Service Bureaus [2,733,240] 2,747,240
T610 Youth Service Bureau Enhancement 1,115,161
T611 AGENCY TOTAL [823,265,005] 837,314,005
T612
T613 JUDICIAL
T614
T615 JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
T616 Personal Services [385,678,706] 403,506,289
T617 Other Expenses [74,997,164] 75,355,354
T618 Forensic Sex Evidence Exams 1,348,010
T619 Alternative Incarceration Program [70,000,000] 73,990,000
T620 Justice Education Center, Inc. 516,287
T621 Juvenile Alternative Incarceration [35,768,876] 34,518,876
T622 Probate Court [3,634,932] 455,812
T623 Workers' Compensation Claims 6,042,106
T624 Victim Security Account 8,792
T625 Children of Incarcerated Parents [542,683] 792,683
T626 Legal Aid 4,397,144
T627 Youth Violence Initiative 5,592,428
T628 Youth Services Prevention [8,293,132] 8,033,132
T629 Children's Law Center [150,000] 200,000
T630 Project Longevity [4,221,255] 3,471,255
T631 Juvenile Planning 945,000
T632 Juvenile Justice Outreach Services 27,945,080
T633 Board and Care for Children - Short-term and 12,953,332
Residential
T634 LGBTQ Justice and Opportunity Network 256,382
T635 Counsel for Domestic Violence 1,250,000
T636 Outreach Services for Norwich 675,000
LCO 18 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T637 Services for Child and Adult Victims 2,855,000
T638 Various Grants 130,024
T639 AGENCY TOTAL [645,216,309] 665,237,986
T640
T641 PUBLIC DEFENDER SERVICES
COMMISSION
T642 Personal Services 58,383,519
T643 Other Expenses 1,589,903
T644 Assigned Counsel - Criminal [41,354,960] 41,008,344
T645 Expert Witnesses [2,775,604] 3,122,220
T646 Training And Education 119,748
T647 AGENCY TOTAL 104,223,734
T648
T649 NON-FUNCTIONAL
T650
T651 DEBT SERVICE - STATE TREASURER
T652 Debt Service [2,041,951,996] 2,039,989,119
T653 UConn 2000 - Debt Service [213,698,862] 242,026,362
T654 CHEFA Day Care Security 4,000,000
T655 Pension Obligation Bonds - TRB 284,364,458
T656 Municipal Restructuring [47,778,925] 47,058,347
T657 AGENCY TOTAL [2,591,794,241] 2,617,438,286
T658
T659 STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
T660 Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 65,278,956
T661
T662 STATE COMPTROLLER - FRINGE
BENEFITS
T663 Unemployment Compensation [4,049,400] 4,047,500
T664 Higher Education Alternative Retirement [101,569,100] 50,620,000
System
T665 Pensions and Retirements - Other Statutory 2,433,850
T666 Judges and Compensation Commissioners [31,587,446] 31,945,712
Retirement
T667 Insurance - Group Life 9,736,350
T668 Employers Social Security Tax [227,326,623] 228,624,338
T669 State Employees Health Service Cost [708,024,030] 780,443,130
T670 Retired State Employees Health Service Cost [957,183,800] 996,028,080
T671 Tuition Reimbursement - Training and Travel 150,000
LCO 19 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T672 Other Post Employment Benefits [65,073,558] 65,590,319
T673 SERS Defined Contribution Match [27,991,712] 28,179,449
T674 State Employees Retirement Contributions - [201,080,536] 201,019,273
Normal Cost
T675 State Employees Retirement Contributions - [1,324,870,699] 1,330,298,497
UAL
T676 AGENCY TOTAL [3,661,077,104] 3,729,116,498
T677
T678 RESERVE FOR SALARY ADJUSTMENTS
T679 Reserve For Salary Adjustments 186,551,369
T680
T681 WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS -
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
T682 Workers' Compensation Claims 6,509,800
T683 Workers' Compensation Claims – University 2,271,228
of Connecticut
T684 Claims – University of Connecticut Health 3,460,985
Center
T685 Workers' Compensation Claims – Board of 3,289,276
Regents Higher Ed
T686 Claims – Department of Children and 10,036,952
Families
T687 Workers' Compensation Claims Mental 18,061,027
Health & Addiction Serv
T688 Claim Department of Emergency Services 3,723,135
and Public Protection
T689 Claims – Department of Developmental 12,073,417
Services
T690 Workers' Compensation Claims – 37,722,823
Department of Correction
T691 AGENCY TOTAL 97,148,643
T692
T693 TOTAL - GENERAL FUND [25,455,622,254] 25,690,627,553
T694
T695 LESS:
T696
T697 Unallocated Lapse -73,710,570
T698 Unallocated Lapse - Judicial -5,000,000
T699 Targeted Savings -15,000,000
T700
T701 NET - GENERAL FUND [25,361,911,684] 25,596,916,983
LCO 20 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
4 Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
5 year ending June 30, 2027, in section 2 of public act 25-168, regarding the
6 SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND are amended to read as follows:
T702 2026-2027
T703 GENERAL GOVERNMENT
T704
T705 OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
T706 Personal Services 770,498
T707
T708 DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
T709 Personal Services 2,937,990
T710 State Insurance and Risk Mgmt Operations [17,467,920] 20,967,920
T711 IT Services 1,619,686
T712 AGENCY TOTAL [22,025,596] 25,525,596
T713
T714 REGULATION AND PROTECTION
T715
T716 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES
T717 Personal Services 53,959,126
T718 Other Expenses [19,778,262] 20,367,072
T719 Equipment 668,756
T720 DMV Modernization 3,000,000
T721 Commercial Vehicle Information Systems 324,676
and Networks Project
T722 AGENCY TOTAL [77,730,820] 78,319,630
T723
T724 CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
T725
T726 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
T727 Personal Services 3,781,576
T728 Other Expenses 665,006
T729 AGENCY TOTAL 4,446,582
T730
T731 TRANSPORTATION
T732
LCO 21 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T733 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
T734 Personal Services 236,076,271
T735 Other Expenses [63,434,586] 64,434,586
T736 Equipment [1,376,329] 2,176,329
T737 Minor Capital Projects 449,639
T738 Highway Planning And Research [3,060,131] 3,905,131
T739 Rail Operations [318,803,218] 341,466,521
T740 Bus Operations [301,407,448] 328,865,967
T741 ADA Para-transit Program [51,982,687] 53,535,914
T742 Non-ADA Dial-A-Ride Program 576,361
T743 Pay-As-You-Go Transportation Projects 18,054,208
T744 Transportation Asset Management 3,004,254
T745 Transportation to Work [2,370,629] 2,500,629
T746 AGENCY TOTAL [1,000,595,761] 1,055,045,810
T747
T748 NON-FUNCTIONAL
T749
T750 DEBT SERVICE - STATE TREASURER
T751 Debt Service [1,025,610,574] 962,448,294
T752
T753 STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
T754 Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 5,337,671
T755
T756 STATE COMPTROLLER - FRINGE
BENEFITS
T757 Unemployment Compensation 360,000
T758 Insurance - Group Life 401,600
T759 Employers Social Security Tax 21,697,231
T760 State Employees Health Service Cost [65,927,200] 80,108,200
T761 Other Post Employment Benefits 4,321,112
T762 SERS Defined Contribution Match 1,835,222
T763 State Employees Retirement Contributions - [23,334,444] 23,327,335
Normal Cost
T764 State Employees Retirement Contributions - [136,192,810] 136,648,679
UAL
T765 AGENCY TOTAL [254,069,619] 268,699,379
T766
T767 RESERVE FOR SALARY ADJUSTMENTS
LCO 22 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T768 Reserve For Salary Adjustments 19,864,541
T769
T770 WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS -
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
T771 Workers' Compensation Claims 6,723,297
T772
T773 TOTAL - SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION [2,417,174,959] 2,427,181,298
FUND
T774
T775 LESS:
T776
T777 Unallocated Lapse -12,000,000
T778
T779 NET - SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND [2,405,174,959] 2,415,181,298
7 Sec. 3. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
8 year ending June 30, 2027, in section 3 of public act 25-168, regarding the
9 MASHANTUCKET PEQUOT AND MOHEGAN FUND are amended
10 to read as follows:
T780 2026-2027
T781 GENERAL GOVERNMENT
T782
T783 OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
T784 Grants To Towns [52,541,796] 54,141,796
T785
T786 CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
T787
T788 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
T789 Various Grants 150,000
T790
T791 TOTAL - MASHANTUCKET PEQUOT AND [52,541,796] 54,291,796
MOHEGAN FUND
11 Sec. 4. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
12 year ending June 30, 2027, in section 4 of public act 25-168, regarding the
13 BANKING FUND are amended to read as follows:
LCO 23 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T792 2026-2027
T793 GENERAL GOVERNMENT
T794
T795 DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
T796 Personal Services [413,105] 462,372
T797 Fringe Benefits [307,747] 346,176
T798 IT Services 360,334
T799 AGENCY TOTAL [1,081,186] 1,168,882
T800
T801 REGULATION AND PROTECTION
T802
T803 DEPARTMENT OF BANKING
T804 Personal Services [15,496,809] 13,947,542
T805 Other Expenses 1,375,510
T806 Equipment 44,900
T807 Fringe Benefits [12,399,055] 10,660,626
T808 Indirect Overhead 1,404,178
T809 AGENCY TOTAL [30,720,452] 27,432,756
T810
T811 LABOR DEPARTMENT
T812 Opportunity Industrial Centers 738,708
T813 Customized Services 965,689
T814 AGENCY TOTAL 1,704,397
T815
T816 CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
T817
T818 DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
T819 Fair Housing 670,000
T820
T821 JUDICIAL
T822
T823 JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
T824 Foreclosure Mediation Program 2,158,656
T825
T826 NON-FUNCTIONAL
T827
T828 STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
LCO 24 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T829 Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 261,199
T830
T831 TOTAL - BANKING FUND [36,595,890] 33,395,890
14 Sec. 5. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
15 year ending June 30, 2027, in section 5 of public act 25-168, regarding the
16 INSURANCE FUND are amended to read as follows:
T832 2026-2027
T833 GENERAL GOVERNMENT
T834
T835 OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
T836 Personal Services 374,039
T837 Other Expenses [6,012] 9,253,008
T838 Fringe Benefits 277,130
T839 AGENCY TOTAL [657,181] 9,904,177
T840
T841 DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
T842 Personal Services [905,796] 1,006,493
T843 Fringe Benefits [656,984] 735,528
T844 IT Services 514,136
T845 AGENCY TOTAL [2,076,916] 2,256,157
T846
T847 REGULATION AND PROTECTION
T848
T849 INSURANCE DEPARTMENT
T850 Personal Services [17,428,950] 17,328,253
T851 Other Expenses 1,609,489
T852 Equipment 62,500
T853 Fringe Benefits [13,071,712] 13,528,237
T854 Indirect Overhead [1,594,604] 1,411,492
T855 AGENCY TOTAL [33,767,255] 33,939,971
T856
T857 OFFICE OF THE HEALTHCARE
ADVOCATE
T858 Personal Services [1,947,836] 2,053,260
T859 Other Expenses 292,991
T860 Equipment 5,000
LCO 25 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T861 Fringe Benefits [1,831,655] 1,718,526
T862 Indirect Overhead [79,775] 44,424
T863 AGENCY TOTAL [4,157,257] 4,114,201
T864
T865 CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
T866
T867 DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
T868 Crumbling Foundations 182,977
T869
T870 HEALTH
T871
T872 DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
T873 Needle and Syringe Exchange Program 513,515
T874 Children's Health Initiatives 3,389,838
T875 AIDS Services 5,366,231
T876 Breast and Cervical Cancer Detection and 2,563,100
Treatment
T877 Immunization Services 50,845,097
T878 X-Ray Screening and Tuberculosis Care [971,849] 871,849
T879 Venereal Disease Control 203,256
T880 AGENCY TOTAL [63,852,886] 63,752,886
T881
T882 [OFFICE OF HEALTH STRATEGY]
T883 [Personal Services] [1,487,574]
T884 [Other Expenses] [10,398,780]
T885 [Equipment] [10,000]
T886 [Fringe Benefits] [1,406,339]
T887 [AGENCY TOTAL] [13,302,693]
T888
T889 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH
AND ADDICTION SERVICES
T890 Managed Service System 462,699
T891
T892 HUMAN SERVICES
T893
T894 OFFICE OF THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADVOCATE
T895 Personal Services 387,000
T896 Other Expenses 65,500
LCO 26 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T897 Fringe Benefits 401,000
T898 Indirect Overhead 22,500
T899 AGENCY TOTAL 876,000
T900
T901
T902 DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND
DISABILITY SERVICES
T903 Fall Prevention 382,660
T904
T905 NON-FUNCTIONAL
T906
T907 STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
T908 Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 391,026
T909
T910 TOTAL - INSURANCE FUND [120,109,550] 116,262,754
17 Sec. 6. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
18 year ending June 30, 2027, in section 6 of public act 25-168, regarding the
19 CONSUMER COUNSEL AND PUBLIC UTILITY CONTROL FUND are
20 amended to read as follows:
T911 2026-2027
T912 GENERAL GOVERNMENT
T913
T914 OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
T915 Personal Services 200,396
T916 Other Expenses 2,000
T917 Fringe Benefits 196,074
T918 AGENCY TOTAL 398,470
T919
T920 DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
T921 Personal Services 96,173
T922 Fringe Benefits 88,135
T923 AGENCY TOTAL 184,308
T924
T925 REGULATION AND PROTECTION
T926
LCO 27 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T927 OFFICE OF CONSUMER COUNSEL
T928 Personal Services [2,288,944] 2,468,944
T929 Other Expenses 461,482
T930 Equipment 2,200
T931 Fringe Benefits [1,724,601] 1,844,601
T932 Indirect Overhead [157,648] 124,209
T933 AGENCY TOTAL [4,634,875] 4,901,436
T934
T935 PUBLIC UTILITIES REGULATORY
AUTHORITY
T936 Personal Services 10,758,487
T937 Other Expenses 335,000
T938 Fringe Benefits 8,316,311
T939 AGENCY TOTAL 19,409,798
T940
T941 CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
T942
T943 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
T944 Personal Services [17,340,038] 6,581,551
T945 Other Expenses [1,479,367] 1,144,367
T946 Equipment 19,500
T947 Fringe Benefits [12,689,262] 5,087,538
T948 Indirect Overhead [489,330] 354,058
T949 AGENCY TOTAL [32,017,497] 13,187,014
T950
T951 NON-FUNCTIONAL
T952
T953 STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
T954 Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 284,112
T955
T956 TOTAL - CONSUMER COUNSEL AND [37,519,262] 38,365,138
PUBLIC UTILITY CONTROL FUND
21 Sec. 7. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
22 year ending June 30, 2027, in section 7 of public act 25-168, regarding the
23 WORKERS' COMPENSATION FUND are amended to read as follows:
LCO 28 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T957 2026-2027
T958 GENERAL GOVERNMENT
T959
T960 DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
T961 Personal Services [663,688] 781,925
T962 Fringe Benefits [528,600] 620,825
T963 IT Services 199,938
T964 AGENCY TOTAL [1,392,226] 1,602,688
T965
T966 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
T967 Personal Services 474,947
T968 Other Expenses 10,428
T969 Fringe Benefits 489,396
T970 AGENCY TOTAL 974,771
T971
T972 REGULATION AND PROTECTION
T973
T974 LABOR DEPARTMENT
T975 Occupational Health Clinics 708,113
T976
T977 WORKERS' COMPENSATION
COMMISSION
T978 Personal Services [9,841,921] 9,868,493
T979 Other Expenses 2,476,091
T980 Equipment 1
T981 Fringe Benefits [8,561,814] 8,513,611
T982 Indirect Overhead [1,586,205] 1,134,936
T983 AGENCY TOTAL [22,466,032] 21,993,132
T984
T985 HUMAN SERVICES
T986
T987 DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND
DISABILITY SERVICES
T988 Personal Services 634,783
T989 Other Expenses 48,440
T990 Rehabilitative Services 595,631
T991 Fringe Benefits 467,987
T992 AGENCY TOTAL 1,746,841
LCO 29 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
T993
T994 NON-FUNCTIONAL
T995
T996 STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
T997 Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 149,142
T998
T999 TOTAL - WORKERS' COMPENSATION [27,437,125] 27,174,687
FUND
24 Sec. 8. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
25 year ending June 30, 2027, in section 12 of public act 25-168, regarding
26 the MUNICIPAL REVENUE SHARING FUND are amended to read as
27 follows:
T1000 2026-2027
T1001 GENERAL GOVERNMENT
T1002
T1003 OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
T1004 Supplemental Revenue Sharing Grants 85,932,470
T1005 Motor Vehicle Tax Grants [127,496,890] 111,581,971
T1006 Tiered PILOT [345,980,314] 354,284,704
T1007 AGENCY TOTAL [559,409,674] 551,799,145
28 Sec. 9. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
29 subsection (j) of section 45a-82 of the general statutes, any balance in the
30 Probate Court Administration Fund on June 30, 2026, shall remain in
31 said fund and shall not be transferred to the General Fund.
32 Sec. 10. Section 31 of public act 25-168 is repealed and the following
33 is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
34 The sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of [this
35 act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the State Library, for
36 Other Expenses, for [each of the fiscal years] the fiscal year ending June
37 30, 2026, and $500,000 of the amount appropriated in said section to the
38 State Library, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
39 shall be made available for grants in equal amounts to the following
LCO 30 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
40 library-related programs: (1) United Way of Central and Northeastern
41 Connecticut, for the Dolly Parton Imagination Library; (2) Read to
42 Grow; and (3) Reach Out and Read.
43 Sec. 11. Section 36 of public act 25-168, as amended by section 179 of
44 public act 25-174, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
45 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
46 (a) The sum of $3,000,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
47 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
48 Education, for [Other Expenses] Various Grants, for the fiscal year
49 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal year to
50 provide a grant to EastCONN Regional Educational Service Center.
51 (b) The sum of $900,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
52 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
53 Education, for [Other Expenses] Various Grants, for the fiscal year
54 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal year to
55 provide a grant to EdAdvance Regional Educational Service Center.
56 (c) The sum of $20,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of [this
57 act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
58 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
59 ending June 30, 2026, [and June 30, 2027] and the sum of $20,000 of the
60 amount appropriated in said section to the Department of Education,
61 for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
62 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Norwalk
63 MLK Scholarship Fund.
64 (d) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
65 public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
66 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
67 and the sum of $100,000 of such amount appropriated in said section to
68 the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
69 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years for
70 robotics.
LCO 31 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
71 (e) The sum of $800,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
72 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
73 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
74 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $800,000 of the amount
75 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
76 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
77 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Brother Carl
78 Institute.
79 (f) The sum of $150,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
80 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
81 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
82 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $150,000 of the amount
83 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
84 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
85 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Artists
86 Collective.
87 (g) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
88 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
89 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
90 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
91 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
92 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
93 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Girls on the
94 Run Greater Connecticut.
95 (h) The sum of $350,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
96 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
97 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
98 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $350,000 of the amount
99 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
100 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
101 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Big Brothers
102 and Big Sisters of Connecticut for mentoring in the cities of Hartford and
103 New Haven.
LCO 32 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
104 (i) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
105 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
106 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
107 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $200,000 of the amount
108 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
109 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
110 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to the town of
111 Middletown for youth programming.
112 (j) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
113 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
114 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
115 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
116 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
117 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
118 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to the Boys and
119 Girls Club of Lower Naugatuck Valley for operational support.
120 (k) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
121 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
122 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
123 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
124 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
125 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
126 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Hartford
127 Knights.
128 (l) The sum of $15,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of [this
129 act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
130 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
131 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $15,000 of the amount
132 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
133 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
134 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Hartford
135 Youth Programming.
LCO 33 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
136 (m) The sum of $150,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
137 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
138 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
139 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $150,000 of the amount
140 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
141 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
142 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Active City
143 for youth athletics.
144 (n) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
145 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
146 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
147 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
148 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
149 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
150 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Serving All
151 Vessels Equally (SAVE), Inc. in Norwalk.
152 (o) The sum of $2,000,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
153 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
154 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
155 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $2,000,000 of the amount
156 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
157 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
158 available in [each of] said fiscal years for electrical and computer
159 engineering recruitment and after school K-2 reading tutoring.
160 (p) The sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
161 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
162 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
163 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $25,000 of the amount
164 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
165 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
166 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to EdAdvance
167 School Readiness Council.
LCO 34 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
168 (q) The sum of $210,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
169 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
170 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
171 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $210,000 of the amount
172 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
173 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
174 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Stamford
175 Public Education Foundation.
176 (r) The sum of $1,000,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
177 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
178 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
179 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $1,000,000 of the amount
180 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
181 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
182 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Full Circle
183 Youth Empowerment.
184 (s) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
185 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
186 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
187 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
188 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
189 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
190 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Bridgeport
191 Youth Lacrosse.
192 (t) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
193 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
194 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
195 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $200,000 of the amount
196 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
197 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
198 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to New Haven
199 Reads.
LCO 35 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
200 (u) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
201 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
202 Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
203 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $200,000 of the amount
204 appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
205 Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
206 available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Thompson
207 Alliance District.
208 (v) The sum of $150,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
209 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
210 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
211 and the sum of $200,000 of [such] the amount appropriated in said
212 section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
213 year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years to
214 provide a grant to Big Brothers Big Sisters.
215 (w) The sum of $20,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
216 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
217 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
218 2026, and the sum of $20,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
219 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
220 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
221 to provide a grant to Girls on the Run Greater Connecticut.
222 (x) The sum of $450,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
223 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
224 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
225 and the sum of $350,000 of [such] the amount appropriated in said
226 section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
227 year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years to
228 provide a grant to Effective School Solutions.
229 (y) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
230 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
231 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
LCO 36 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
232 shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Athlife.
233 (z) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
234 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
235 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
236 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
237 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
238 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
239 to provide a grant to the Connecticut Association of Boards of Education
240 for boards of education training.
241 (AA) The sum of $400,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
242 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
243 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
244 and the sum of $200,000 of [such] the amount appropriated in said
245 section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
246 year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years to
247 provide a grant to the Connecticut Association of Schools/Connecticut
248 Interscholastic Athletic Conference for Curriculum Development.
249 (BB) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
250 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
251 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
252 shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Free
253 Agent Now.
254 (CC) The sum of $5,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
255 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
256 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
257 2026, and the sum of $5,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
258 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
259 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
260 to provide a grant to Martin Luther King Scholarship Committee of
261 Greater Middletown.
262 (DD) The sum of $175,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
263 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
LCO 37 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
264 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
265 2026, and the sum of $175,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
266 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
267 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years to
268 provide a grant to VR Sim.
269 (EE) The sum of $10,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
270 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
271 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
272 shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to
273 Greenwich YMCA Scholarship Program.
274 (FF) The sum of $30,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
275 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
276 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
277 2026, and the sum of $30,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
278 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
279 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years to
280 provide a grant to the town of Waterford for school lunch debt.
281 (GG) The sum of $36,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
282 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
283 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
284 2026, and the sum of $36,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
285 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
286 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
287 to provide a grant to the town of Montville for school lunch debt.
288 (HH) The sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
289 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
290 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
291 2026, and the sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
292 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
293 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
294 to provide a grant to Fairfield River-Lab.
295 (II) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
LCO 38 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
296 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
297 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
298 2026, and the sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
299 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
300 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
301 to provide a grant to Bridgeport Caribe Youth Leaders.
302 (JJ) The sum of $175,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
303 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
304 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
305 2026, and the sum of $175,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
306 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
307 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
308 to provide a grant to Elevate Bridgeport.
309 (KK) The sum of $75,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
310 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
311 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
312 2026, and the sum of $75,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
313 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
314 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
315 to provide a grant to the Bridgeport Board of Education for the
316 Bridgeport Public Schools Debate League.
317 (LL) The sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
318 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
319 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
320 2026, and the sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
321 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
322 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
323 to provide a grant to Yellow Mill Scholarship Fund.
324 (MM) The sum of $1,500,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1
325 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department
326 of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June
327 30, 2026, and the sum of $1,500,000 of the amount appropriated in said
LCO 39 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
328 section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
329 year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal
330 years to provide a grant to Waterbury Promise.
331 (NN) The sum of $250,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
332 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
333 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
334 2026, and the sum of $250,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
335 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
336 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
337 to provide a grant to Meriden Boys and Girls Club.
338 (OO) The sum of $10,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
339 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
340 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
341 2026, and the sum of $10,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
342 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
343 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
344 to provide a grant to Newington Public Schools for diverse library
345 circulation materials.
346 (PP) The sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
347 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
348 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
349 2026, and the sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
350 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
351 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
352 to provide a grant to Boys and Girls Club of Milford for AI training.
353 (QQ) The sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
354 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
355 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
356 2026, and the sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
357 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
358 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
359 to provide a grant to New London Public Schools Pre-K and early
LCO 40 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
360 childhood, including transitional kindergarten.
361 (RR) The sum of $90,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
362 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
363 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
364 2026, and the sum of $90,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
365 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
366 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
367 to provide a grant to Stamford Public Education Foundation.
368 (SS) The sum of $50,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
369 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
370 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
371 2026, and the sum of $50,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
372 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
373 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
374 to provide a grant to Sound Waters Summer Camp.
375 (TT) The sum of $250,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
376 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
377 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
378 2026, and the sum of $250,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
379 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
380 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
381 to provide a grant to Windham Public Schools.
382 (UU) The sum of $750,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
383 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
384 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
385 2026, and the sum of $750,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
386 to the Department of Education, for Teacher Residency RESC Alliance,
387 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each
388 of] said fiscal years for a teacher residency program operated by the
389 RESC Alliance.
390 (VV) The sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
391 [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
LCO 41 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
392 Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
393 2026, and the sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
394 to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
395 ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
396 to provide a grant to the State Education Resource Center for
397 disconnected youth programming.
398 Sec. 12. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of title
399 2 of the general statutes and any personnel policies adopted pursuant to
400 said provisions, the Office of Legislative Management shall apply terms
401 consistent with those contained in Article 20, except section 3 of said
402 article, of the tentative agreement for a successor collective bargaining
403 agreement between the State of Connecticut and the Connecticut
404 Employees Union Independent, NP-2 Bargaining Unit (CEUI), ratified
405 on January 8, 2026, and approved pursuant to subsection (f) of section
406 5-278 of the general statutes, and applicable to the fiscal year ending
407 June 30, 2027, to legislative employees for the fiscal year ending June 30,
408 2027.
409 Sec. 13. (Effective from passage) Up to $100,000 of the unexpended
410 balance of funds appropriated to Legislative Management, for Statues,
411 in section 1 of public act 23-204, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024,
412 carried forward in section 9 of public act 24-81, for the fiscal year ending
413 June 30, 2025, and carried forward in section 30 of public act 25-168, for
414 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and
415 shall be made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to
416 support removal of the John Mason statue from the State Capitol
417 building.
418 Sec. 14. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of $100,000 of the amount
419 appropriated in section 3 of this act, to the Department of Energy and
420 Environmental Protection, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending
421 June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal year to the three
422 state-recognized tribes, the Schaghticoke, the Paucatuck Eastern Pequot
423 and the Golden Hill Paugussett, for storm damage clean-up and
424 hazardous tree removal on their reservations.
LCO 42 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
425 Sec. 15. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of $50,000 of the amount
426 appropriated in section 3 of this act, to the Department of Energy and
427 Environmental Protection, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending
428 June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal year to the
429 Mashantucket Pequot Tribe, the Mohegan Tribe of Indians of
430 Connecticut and the three state-recognized tribes, the Schaghticoke, the
431 Paucatuck Eastern Pequot and the Golden Hill Paugussett, for hunting
432 and fishing license fees.
433 Sec. 16. (Effective from passage) The sum of $3,000,000 of the amount
434 appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
435 the Department of Transportation, for Rail Operations, for the fiscal year
436 ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $4,000,000 of the amount
437 appropriated in said section to the Department of Transportation, for
438 Rail Operations, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
439 available in said fiscal years for Shore Line East.
440 Sec. 17. (Effective from passage) The sum of $850,000 of the amount
441 appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
442 the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, for Social
443 Work Law Enforcement Training Partnership, for the fiscal year ending
444 June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried
445 forward for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.
446 Sec. 18. (Effective from passage) Up to $200,000 of the unexpended
447 balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Economic and
448 Community Development, for Various Grants, in section 1 of public act
449 25-168, as amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
450 shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made
451 available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, as a grant to the
452 American Legion Post 17 in Naugatuck.
453 Sec. 19. (Effective from passage) Up to $250,000 of the unexpended
454 balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Children and
455 Families, for Various Grants, in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
456 amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not
LCO 43 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
457 lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be transferred to the Department of
458 Housing, for Various Grants, and made available during the fiscal year
459 ending June 30, 2027, as a grant to Thames River Community Services.
460 Sec. 20. Section 29-1ll of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
461 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
462 1, 2026):
463 (a) The Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, in
464 consultation with the Police Officer Standards and Training Council,
465 shall establish a project to be known as the social work and law
466 enforcement project to advance the ethical and effective integration of
467 social work services into law enforcement units by preparing social
468 workers, social work students and law enforcement professionals to
469 collaborate in the field of police social work. The project shall be located
470 at Southern Connecticut State University. The objectives of the project
471 shall be to: (1) Educate and train the social work and law enforcement
472 workforce to collaborate by using a model that integrates police and
473 social work, (2) increase community wellness through training,
474 research, education and policy advocacy concerning the integration of
475 police and social work, (3) strengthen the engagement among social
476 workers, law enforcement officers and community members, and (4)
477 promote dialogue concerning diversity, disparities and systemic racism
478 in criminal and juvenile justice settings. For purposes of this section,
479 "law enforcement unit" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-
480 294a.
481 (b) Not later than January 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Emergency
482 Services and Public Protection shall enter into a memorandum of
483 understanding with Southern Connecticut State University for the
484 purpose of establishing the social work and law enforcement project.
485 Such memorandum shall include, but need not be limited to, a
486 requirement that any use of funding for the project for a purpose other
487 than providing training or education to a police officer shall require the
488 commissioner's written authorization.
LCO 44 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
489 (c) Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
490 Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection, the Police
491 Officer Standards and Training Council and the president of Southern
492 Connecticut State University shall jointly report, in accordance with the
493 provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the
494 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety
495 and appropriations and the budgets of state agencies on the status of the
496 project and expenditures associated with the project.
497 Sec. 21. (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
498 Student Loan Ombudsman, appointed pursuant to section 36a-25 of the
499 general statutes, shall report, in accordance with the provisions of
500 section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of
501 the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to banking,
502 higher education and appropriations and the budgets of state agencies
503 concerning the activities of the Office of the Student Loan Ombudsman
504 during the calendar years 2025 and 2026.
505 Sec. 22. Section 27-19d of the general statutes is repealed and the
506 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
507 There is established an account to be known as the ["Governor's
508 Guards account"] "Governor's Foot Guards account", which shall be a
509 separate, nonlapsing account within the General Fund. The account
510 shall contain any moneys required by law to be deposited in the account,
511 which shall include, but not be limited to, the proceeds of Governor's
512 Foot Guards programs. Moneys in the account shall be expended by the
513 Adjutant General for the purposes of facilitating the operations of the
514 Governor's Guards.
515 Sec. 23. Section 27-19e of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
516 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
517 1, 2026):
518 (a) There is established an account to be known as the "Governor's
519 Guards horse account", which shall be a separate, nonlapsing account.
520 The account shall contain any moneys required by law to be deposited
LCO 45 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
521 in the account, which shall include, but not be limited to, donations for
522 the specific purpose of offsetting the costs of maintaining Governor's
523 Guards' horses.
524 (b) There is established a subaccount within the Governor's Guards
525 horse account, established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to
526 be known as the "First Company Governor's Horse Guard account" to
527 be used solely for activities relating to the First Company Governor's
528 Horse Guard in Avon.
529 (c) There is established a subaccount within the Governor's Guards
530 horse account, established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to
531 be known as the "Second Company Governor's Horse Guard account"
532 to be used solely for activities relating to the Second Company
533 Governor's Horse Guard in Newtown.
534 (d) Moneys in the account shall be expended by the Adjutant General
535 for the purposes of facilitating the operations of the Governor's Guards.
536 Sec. 24. Section 10a-174d of the 2026 supplement to the general
537 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
538 (Effective July 1, 2026):
539 (a) As used in this section:
540 (1) "Award" means the greater of: (A) The unpaid portion, if any, of a
541 qualifying student's eligible institutional costs after subtracting such
542 student's financial aid, or (B) a minimum award of five hundred dollars
543 for a full-time student or three hundred dollars for a part-time student;
544 (2) "Eligible institutional costs" means the tuition and required fees
545 incurred each semester by an individual student that are established by
546 the Board of Regents for Higher Education for the Connecticut State
547 University System and Charter Oak State College;
548 (3) "Financial aid" means the sum of all scholarships, grants and
549 federal, state and institutional aid received by a qualifying student.
550 "Financial aid" does not include any federal, state or private student
LCO 46 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
551 loans received by a qualifying student;
552 (4) "Qualifying student" means any person who (A) participated in
553 the debt-free community college program, established pursuant to
554 section 10a-174, and [completed not fewer than sixty credits through
555 said program] received an associate's degree at the Connecticut State
556 Community College, (B) enrolls as a full-time or part-time student for
557 the fall semester of 2026, or any semester thereafter, at a state university
558 within the Connecticut State University System or Charter Oak State
559 College in a program leading to a bachelor's degree, (C) is classified as
560 an in-state student pursuant to section 10a-29, (D) made satisfactory
561 academic progress while enrolled at the Connecticut State Community
562 College and continues to make satisfactory academic progress while
563 enrolled at such state university or Charter Oak State College, (E) has
564 completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, and (F) has
565 accepted all available financial aid;
566 (5) "Full-time student" means a student who is enrolled at a state
567 university within the Connecticut State University System or Charter
568 Oak State College and (A) is carrying twelve or more credit hours in a
569 semester, or (B) has a learning disability documented with such
570 university in which he or she is enrolled and is enrolled in the maximum
571 number of credit hours that is feasible for such student to attempt in a
572 semester, as determined by such student's academic advisor;
573 (6) "Semester" means the fall or spring semester of an academic year.
574 "Semester" does not include a summer semester or session; and
575 (7) "Part-time student" means a student who is enrolled at a state
576 university within the Connecticut State University System or Charter
577 Oak State College and is carrying not less than six but fewer than twelve
578 credit hours in a semester.
579 (b) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall (1) establish a
580 finish line scholars program to make awards to qualifying students each
581 semester, (2) adopt rules, procedures and forms necessary to implement
582 the finish line scholars program, and (3) submit a report outlining such
LCO 47 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
583 rules, procedures and forms, in accordance with the provisions of
584 section 11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
585 having cognizance of matters relating to higher education.
586 (c) For the fall semester of 2026, and each semester thereafter, the
587 Board of Regents for Higher Education shall make awards to qualifying
588 students. [within available appropriations.] An award shall be available
589 to a qualifying student for the first seventy-two credit hours earned by
590 the qualifying student at a state university within the Connecticut State
591 University System or Charter Oak State College, as applicable, or until
592 such qualifying student earns a bachelor's degree, whichever is earlier,
593 provided the qualifying student meets and continues to meet the
594 requirements of this section. The board shall not use an award to
595 supplant any financial aid, including, but not limited to, state or
596 institutional aid, otherwise available to a qualifying student.
597 (d) Not later than [November 1, 2026, and March 1, 2027, and each
598 semester] January 1, 2027, June 1, 2027, and quarterly thereafter, the
599 Board of Regents for Higher Education shall report, in accordance with
600 the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the
601 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to higher
602 education and employment advancement and appropriations and the
603 budgets of the state agencies regarding the finish line scholars program,
604 including, but not limited to, (1) the number of qualifying students
605 enrolled at a state university within the Connecticut State University
606 System and Charter Oak State College during each semester, (2) the
607 number of qualifying students receiving minimum awards and the
608 number of qualifying students receiving awards for the unpaid portion
609 of eligible institutional costs, (3) the average number of credit hours the
610 qualifying students enrolled in each semester and the average number
611 of credit hours the qualifying students completed each semester, (4) the
612 average amount of the award made to qualifying students under this
613 section for the unpaid portion of eligible institutional costs, [and] (5) the
614 degree completion rates of qualifying students receiving awards under
615 this section by subject area, and (6) the average amount of institutional
616 aid awarded to (A) Finish Line Scholars recipients by Student Aid Index
LCO 48 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
617 groupings, and (B) students who did not receive a Finish Line Scholars
618 award by the same Student Aid Index groupings.
619 Sec. 25. Section 1. Subdivision (1) of subsection (h) of section 17b-340
620 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes, as amended by section
621 64 of public act 26-1, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
622 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
623 (h) (1) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 1993, any intermediate care
624 facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities with an operating
625 cost component of its rate in excess of one hundred forty per cent of the
626 median of operating cost components of rates in effect January 1, 1992,
627 shall not receive an operating cost component increase. For the fiscal
628 year ending June 30, 1993, any intermediate care facility for individuals
629 with intellectual disabilities with an operating cost component of its rate
630 that is less than one hundred forty per cent of the median of operating
631 cost components of rates in effect January 1, 1992, shall have an
632 allowance for real wage growth equal to thirty per cent of the increase
633 determined in accordance with subsection (q) of section 17-311-52 of the
634 regulations of Connecticut state agencies, provided such operating cost
635 component shall not exceed one hundred forty per cent of the median
636 of operating cost components in effect January 1, 1992. Any facility with
637 real property other than land placed in service prior to October 1, 1991,
638 shall, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1995, receive a rate of return on
639 real property equal to the average of the rates of return applied to real
640 property other than land placed in service for the five years preceding
641 October 1, 1993. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, and any
642 succeeding fiscal year, the rate of return on real property for property
643 items shall be revised every five years. The commissioner shall, upon
644 submission of a request, allow actual debt service, comprised of
645 principal and interest, in excess of property costs allowed pursuant to
646 section 17-311-52 of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies,
647 provided such debt service terms and amounts are reasonable in
648 relation to the useful life and the base value of the property. For the fiscal
649 year ending June 30, 1995, and any succeeding fiscal year, the inflation
650 adjustment made in accordance with subsection (p) of section 17-311-52
LCO 49 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
651 of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies shall not be applied to
652 real property costs. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, and any
653 succeeding fiscal year, the allowance for real wage growth, as
654 determined in accordance with subsection (q) of section 17-311-52 of the
655 regulations of Connecticut state agencies, shall not be applied. For the
656 fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, and any succeeding fiscal year, no rate
657 shall exceed three hundred seventy-five dollars per day unless the
658 commissioner, in consultation with the Commissioner of
659 Developmental Services, determines after a review of program and
660 management costs, that a rate in excess of this amount is necessary for
661 care and treatment of facility residents. For the fiscal year ending June
662 30, 2002, rate period, the Commissioner of Social Services shall increase
663 the inflation adjustment for rates made in accordance with subsection
664 (p) of section 17-311-52 of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies
665 to update allowable fiscal year 2000 costs to include a three and one-half
666 per cent inflation factor. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, rate
667 period, the commissioner shall increase the inflation adjustment for
668 rates made in accordance with subsection (p) of section 17-311-52 of the
669 regulations of Connecticut state agencies to update allowable fiscal year
670 2001 costs to include a one and one-half per cent inflation factor, except
671 that such increase shall be effective November 1, 2002, and such facility
672 rate in effect for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, shall be paid for
673 services provided until October 31, 2002, except any facility that would
674 have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2002, than for the fiscal
675 year ending June 30, 2002, due to interim rate status or agreement with
676 the department shall be issued such lower rate effective July 1, 2002, and
677 have such rate updated effective November 1, 2002, in accordance with
678 applicable statutes and regulations. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
679 2004, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2003, shall remain in
680 effect, except any facility that would have been issued a lower rate
681 effective July 1, 2003, than for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, due
682 to interim rate status or agreement with the department shall be issued
683 such lower rate effective July 1, 2003. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
684 2005, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2004, shall remain in
685 effect until September 30, 2004. Effective October 1, 2004, each facility
LCO 50 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
686 shall receive a rate that is five per cent greater than the rate in effect
687 September 30, 2004. Effective upon receipt of all the necessary federal
688 approvals to secure federal financial participation matching funds
689 associated with the rate increase provided in subdivision (4) of
690 subsection (f) of this section, but in no event earlier than October 1, 2005,
691 and provided the user fee imposed under section 17b-320 is required to
692 be collected, each facility shall receive a rate that is four per cent more
693 than the rate the facility received in the prior fiscal year, except any
694 facility that would have been issued a lower rate effective October 1,
695 2005, than for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, due to interim rate
696 status or agreement with the department, shall be issued such lower rate
697 effective October 1, 2005. Such rate increase shall remain in effect unless:
698 (A) The federal financial participation matching funds associated with
699 the rate increase are no longer available; or (B) the user fee created
700 pursuant to section 17b-320 is not in effect. For the fiscal year ending
701 June 30, 2007, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2006, shall
702 remain in effect until September 30, 2006, except any facility that would
703 have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2006, than for the fiscal
704 year ending June 30, 2006, due to interim rate status or agreement with
705 the department, shall be issued such lower rate effective July 1, 2006.
706 Effective October 1, 2006, no facility shall receive a rate that is more than
707 three per cent greater than the rate in effect for the facility on September
708 30, 2006, except any facility that would have been issued a lower rate
709 effective October 1, 2006, due to interim rate status or agreement with
710 the department, shall be issued such lower rate effective October 1, 2006.
711 For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, each facility shall receive a rate
712 that is two and nine-tenths per cent greater than the rate in effect for the
713 period ending June 30, 2007, except any facility that would have been
714 issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2007, than for the rate period ending
715 June 30, 2007, due to interim rate status, or agreement with the
716 department, shall be issued such lower rate effective July 1, 2007. For the
717 fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, rates in effect for the period ending June
718 30, 2008, shall remain in effect until June 30, 2009, except any facility that
719 would have been issued a lower rate for the fiscal year ending June 30,
720 2009, due to interim rate status or agreement with the department, shall
LCO 51 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
721 be issued such lower rate. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2010, and
722 June 30, 2011, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2009, shall
723 remain in effect until June 30, 2011, except any facility that would have
724 been issued a lower rate for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, or the
725 fiscal year ending June 30, 2011, due to interim rate status or agreement
726 with the department, shall be issued such lower rate. For the fiscal year
727 ending June 30, 2012, rates in effect for the period ending June 30, 2011,
728 shall remain in effect until June 30, 2012, except any facility that would
729 have been issued a lower rate for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2012,
730 due to interim rate status or agreement with the department, shall be
731 issued such lower rate. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2014, and
732 June 30, 2015, rates shall not exceed those in effect for the period ending
733 June 30, 2013, except the rate paid to a facility may be higher than the
734 rate paid to the facility for the period ending June 30, 2013, if a capital
735 improvement approved by the Department of Developmental Services,
736 in consultation with the Department of Social Services, for the health or
737 safety of the residents was made to the facility during the fiscal year
738 ending June 30, 2014, or June 30, 2015, to the extent such rate increases
739 are within available appropriations. Any facility that would have been
740 issued a lower rate for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2014, or the fiscal
741 year ending June 30, 2015, due to interim rate status or agreement with
742 the department, shall be issued such lower rate. For the fiscal years
743 ending June 30, 2016, and June 30, 2017, rates shall not exceed those in
744 effect for the period ending June 30, 2015, except the rate paid to a
745 facility may be higher than the rate paid to the facility for the period
746 ending June 30, 2015, if a capital improvement approved by the
747 Department of Developmental Services, in consultation with the
748 Department of Social Services, for the health or safety of the residents
749 was made to the facility during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, or
750 June 30, 2017, to the extent such rate increases are within available
751 appropriations. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2016, and June 30,
752 2017, and each succeeding fiscal year, any facility that would have been
753 issued a lower rate, due to interim rate status, a change in allowable fair
754 rent or agreement with the department, shall be issued such lower rate.
755 For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2018, and June 30, 2019, rates shall
LCO 52 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
756 not exceed those in effect for the period ending June 30, 2017, except the
757 rate paid to a facility may be higher than the rate paid to the facility for
758 the period ending June 30, 2017, if a capital improvement approved by
759 the Department of Developmental Services, in consultation with the
760 Department of Social Services, for the health or safety of the residents
761 was made to the facility during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, or
762 June 30, 2019, only to the extent such rate increases are within available
763 appropriations. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2020, and June 30,
764 2021, rates shall not exceed those in effect for the fiscal year ending June
765 30, 2019, except the rate paid to a facility may be higher than the rate
766 paid to the facility for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2019, if a capital
767 improvement approved by the Department of Developmental Services,
768 in consultation with the Department of Social Services, for the health or
769 safety of the residents was made to the facility during the fiscal year
770 ending June 30, 2020, or June 30, 2021, only to the extent such rate
771 increases are within available appropriations. For the fiscal year ending
772 June 30, 2022, rates shall not exceed those in effect for the fiscal year
773 ending June 30, 2021, except the commissioner may, in the
774 commissioner's discretion and within available appropriations, provide
775 pro rata fair rent increases to facilities that have documented fair rent
776 additions placed in service in the cost report year ending September 30,
777 2020, that are not otherwise included in rates issued. For the fiscal year
778 ending June 30, 2023, rates shall not exceed those in effect for the fiscal
779 year ending June 30, 2022, except the commissioner may, in the
780 commissioner's discretion and within available appropriations, provide
781 pro rata fair rent increases to facilities which have documented fair rent
782 additions placed in service in the cost report year ending September 30,
783 2021, that are not otherwise included in rates issued. For the fiscal years
784 ending June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023, a facility may receive a rate
785 increase for a capital improvement approved by the Department of
786 Developmental Services, in consultation with the Department of Social
787 Services, for the health or safety of the residents during the fiscal year
788 ending June 30, 2022, or June 30, 2023, only to the extent such rate
789 increases are within available appropriations. There shall be no increase
790 to rates based on inflation or any inflationary factor for the fiscal years
LCO 53 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
791 ending June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023. Notwithstanding any other
792 provisions of this chapter, any subsequent increase to allowable
793 operating costs, excluding fair rent, shall be inflated by the gross
794 domestic product deflator when funding is specifically appropriated for
795 such purposes in the enacted budget. The rate of inflation shall be
796 computed by comparing the most recent rate year to the average of the
797 gross domestic product deflator for the previous four fiscal quarters
798 ending March thirty-first. Any increase to rates based on inflation shall
799 be applied prior to the application of any other budget adjustment
800 factors that may impact such rates. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
801 2024, the department shall determine facility rates based upon 2022 cost
802 report filings subject to the provisions of this section, adjusted to reflect
803 any rate increases provided after the cost report year ending June 30,
804 2022, and with the addition of a two per cent adjustment factor. No
805 facility shall receive a rate less than the rate in effect for the fiscal year
806 ending June 30, 2023. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, the
807 minimum per diem, per bed rate shall remain at five hundred one
808 dollars for a residential facility licensed pursuant to section 17a-227 and
809 certified to participate in the Title XIX Medicaid program as an
810 intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disability.
811 There shall be no increase to rates based on any inflationary factor for
812 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
813 2024, and each subsequent fiscal year, the commissioner may, in the
814 commissioner's discretion and within available appropriations, provide
815 pro rata fair rent increases to facilities that have documented fair rent
816 additions placed in service in the cost report years that are not otherwise
817 included in rates issued. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the
818 department shall determine facility rates based upon 2023 cost report
819 filings subject to the provisions of this section, adjusted to reflect any
820 rate increases provided after the cost report ending June 30, 2023. A
821 facility may receive a rate that is less than the rate in effect for the fiscal
822 year ending June 30, 2024, but shall not receive a rate less than the
823 minimum per diem, per bed rate. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
824 2025, the minimum per diem, per bed rate shall remain at five hundred
825 one dollars for a residential facility licensed pursuant to section 17a-227
LCO 54 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
826 and certified to participate in the Title XIX Medicaid program as an
827 intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disability.
828 There shall be no increase to rates based on any inflationary factor for
829 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
830 2026, the department shall determine facility rates based upon 2024 cost
831 report filings subject to the provisions of this section, adjusted to reflect
832 any rate increases provided after the cost report ending June 30, 2024.
833 Additionally, the facility shall receive a rate that is three and four-tenths
834 per cent greater than the calculated rate, except that any facility that
835 would have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2025, due to interim
836 rate status, or agreement with the department, shall be issued such
837 lower rate effective July 1, 2025. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
838 there shall be no minimum per diem, per bed rate for a residential
839 facility licensed pursuant to section 17a-227 and certified to participate
840 in the Title XIX Medicaid program as an intermediate care facility for
841 individuals with intellectual disability. There shall be no increase to
842 rates based on any inflationary factor for the fiscal year ending June 30,
843 2026. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, each facility shall receive
844 a rate that is five and eight-tenths per cent greater than the rate in effect
845 for the period ending June 30, 2026, except that any facility that would
846 have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2026, than the rate for the
847 period ending June 30, 2027, due to interim rate status, or agreement
848 with the department, shall be issued such lower rate effective July 1,
849 2026. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, each facility shall receive
850 a rate that is six and three-tenths per cent greater than the rate in effect
851 for the period ending June 30, 2027, except that any facility that would
852 have been issued a lower rate effective July 1, 2027, than the rate for the
853 period ending June 30, 2027, due to interim rate status, or agreement
854 with the department, shall be issued such lower rate effective July 1,
855 2027. Effective January 1, 2028, each facility shall receive a rate that is six
856 and three-tenths per cent greater than the rate in effect for the period
857 ending December 31, 2027, except that any facility that would have been
858 issued a lower rate effective January 1, 2028, than the rate for the period
859 ending December 31, 2027, due to interim rate status, or agreement with
860 the department, shall be issued such lower rate effective January 1, 2028.
LCO 55 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
861 For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, a facility
862 may receive a rate increase for a capital improvement approved by the
863 Department of Developmental Services, in consultation with the
864 Department of Social Services, for the health or safety of the residents
865 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, or June 30, 2025, only to the
866 extent such rate increases are within available appropriations. For the
867 fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, a facility may receive
868 a rate increase for a capital improvement approved by the Department
869 of Developmental Services, in consultation with the Department of
870 Social Services, for the health or safety of the residents during the fiscal
871 year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, only to the extent such rate
872 increases are within available appropriations. Any facility that has a
873 significant decrease in land and building costs shall receive a reduced
874 rate to reflect such decrease in land and building costs. For the fiscal
875 years ending June 30, 2012, June 30, 2013, June 30, 2014, June 30, 2015,
876 June 30, 2016, June 30, 2017, June 30, 2018, June 30, 2019, June 30, 2020,
877 June 30, 2021, June 30, 2022, June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025,
878 June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the Commissioner of Social Services
879 may provide fair rent increases to any facility that has undergone a
880 material change in circumstances related to fair rent and has an
881 approved certificate of need pursuant to section 17b-352, 17b-353, 17b-
882 354 or 17b-355. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 17-311-52 of
883 the regulations of Connecticut state agencies, when determining facility
884 rates for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the department shall waive
885 the separate inflation cost limitation on direct care costs as reported in
886 the 2024 cost report filings. The waiving of this limitation shall be
887 applied prior to the application of any statutory rate increases. The
888 Department of Social Services shall amend the regulations of
889 Connecticut state agencies to allow for the waiver of the separate
890 inflation cost limitation on direct care costs when rebasing rates for
891 intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities
892 after the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. Notwithstanding the
893 provisions of this section, the Commissioner of Social Services may,
894 within available appropriations, increase or decrease rates issued to
895 intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities
LCO 56 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
896 to reflect a reduction in available appropriations as provided in
897 subsection (a) of this section. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2014,
898 and June 30, 2015, the commissioner shall not consider rebasing in
899 determining rates. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection,
900 effective July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2022, the commissioner shall, within
901 available appropriations, increase rates for the purpose of wage and
902 benefit enhancements for employees of intermediate care facilities.
903 Facilities that receive a rate adjustment for the purpose of wage and
904 benefit enhancements but do not provide increases in employee salaries
905 as described in this subsection on or before July 31, 2021, and July 31,
906 2022, respectively, may be subject to a rate decrease in the same amount
907 as the adjustment by the commissioner.
908 Sec. 26. Subsection (b) of section 12-18b of the 2026 supplement to the
909 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
910 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
911 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 12-19a and 12-20a, on
912 or before September thirtieth, annually, all funds appropriated for state
913 grants in lieu of taxes shall be payable to municipalities and fire districts
914 pursuant to the provisions of this section. On or before January first,
915 annually, the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall
916 determine the amount due, as a state grant in lieu of taxes, to each
917 municipality and fire district in this state wherein college and hospital
918 property is located and to each municipality and fire district in this state
919 wherein state, municipal or tribal property, except that which was
920 acquired and used for highways and bridges, but not excepting
921 property acquired and used for highway administration or maintenance
922 purposes, is located. Such determination shall be calculated based on
923 assessed values provided to the Office of Policy and Management prior
924 to the preceding April first, pursuant to section 12-19b.
925 (1) The grant payable to any municipality or fire district for state,
926 municipal or tribal property under the provisions of this section in the
927 fiscal year ending June 30, 2022, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be
928 equal to the total of:
LCO 57 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
929 (A) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
930 paid with respect to any facility designated by the Commissioner of
931 Correction, on or before August first of each year, to be a correctional
932 facility administered under the auspices of the Department of
933 Correction or a juvenile residential center under direction of the Judicial
934 Branch that was used for incarcerative purposes during the preceding
935 fiscal year. If a list containing the name and location of such designated
936 facilities and information concerning their use for purposes of
937 incarceration during the preceding fiscal year is not available from the
938 Secretary of the State on August first of any year, the Commissioner of
939 Correction shall, on said date, certify to the Secretary of the Office of
940 Policy and Management a list containing such information;
941 (B) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
942 paid with respect to that portion of the John Dempsey Hospital located
943 at The University of Connecticut Health Center in Farmington that is
944 used as a permanent medical ward for prisoners under the custody of
945 the Department of Correction. Nothing in this section shall be construed
946 as designating any portion of The University of Connecticut Health
947 Center John Dempsey Hospital as a correctional facility;
948 (C) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
949 paid on any land [designated within the 1983 Settlement boundary and]
950 taken into trust by the federal government for the Mashantucket Pequot
951 Tribal Nation on or after June 8, 1999;
952 (D) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
953 paid with respect to the property and facilities owned by the
954 Connecticut Port Authority;
955 (E) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of section 12-19a, sixty-
956 five per cent of the property taxes that would have been paid with
957 respect to the buildings and grounds comprising Connecticut Valley
958 Hospital and Whiting Forensic Hospital in Middletown;
959 (F) With respect to any municipality in which more than fifty per cent
960 of the property is state-owned real property, one hundred per cent of
LCO 58 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
961 the property taxes that would have been paid with respect to such state-
962 owned property;
963 (G) Forty-five per cent of the property taxes that would have been
964 paid with respect to all municipally owned airports; except for the
965 exemption applicable to such property, on the assessment list in such
966 municipality for the assessment date two years prior to the
967 commencement of the state fiscal year in which such grant is payable.
968 The grant provided pursuant to this section for any municipally owned
969 airport shall be paid to any municipality in which the airport is located,
970 except that the grant applicable to Sikorsky Airport shall be paid one-
971 half to the town of Stratford and one-half to the city of Bridgeport;
972 (H) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
973 paid with respect to any land [designated within the 1983 Settlement
974 boundary and] taken into trust by the federal government for the
975 Mashantucket Pequot Tribal Nation prior to June 8, 1999, or taken into
976 trust by the federal government for the Mohegan Tribe of Indians of
977 Connecticut, provided the real property subject to this subparagraph
978 shall be the land only, and shall not include the assessed value of any
979 structures, buildings or other improvements on such land; and
980 (I) Forty-five per cent of the property taxes that would have been paid
981 with respect to all other state-owned real property.
982 (2) The grant payable to any municipality or fire district for college
983 and hospital property under the provisions of this section in the fiscal
984 year ending June 30, 2017, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be equal
985 to the total of seventy-seven per cent of the property taxes that, except
986 for any exemption applicable to any college and hospital property under
987 the provisions of section 12-81, would have been paid with respect to
988 college and hospital property on the assessment list in such municipality
989 or fire district for the assessment date two years prior to the
990 commencement of the state fiscal year in which such grant is payable.
991 Sec. 27. Section 2-83 of the general statutes is repealed and the
992 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
LCO 59 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
993 (a) Such interns shall be appointed for the duration of the spring
994 semester of such interns' institution of higher education, and may
995 continue to serve for the duration of the regular session of the General
996 Assembly or any subsequent special sessions of the General Assembly.
997 The committee shall (1) appoint a program coordinator, and (2)
998 authorize the expenses of administration of the program. [, and (3) pay
999 at least one-half of the stipend awarded to such interns, the remainder
1000 of such stipend to be paid out of appropriations to the committee
1001 therefor.]
1002 (b) Each such intern shall be paid (1) a stipend of one thousand five
1003 hundred dollars for each regular session, and (2) as an allowance for
1004 transportation, such rate per mile as shall from time to time be
1005 determined by the Joint Committee on Legislative Management. Such
1006 allowance shall be paid for each mile on each day that such intern is
1007 required to travel from such intern's home to the State Capitol and
1008 return therefrom for official legislative business.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 8 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 9 from passage New section
Sec. 10 July 1, 2026 PA 25-168, Sec. 31
Sec. 11 July 1, 2026 PA 25-168, Sec. 36
Sec. 12 from passage New section
Sec. 13 from passage New section
Sec. 14 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 15 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 16 from passage New section
Sec. 17 from passage New section
LCO 60 of 61

Substitute Bill No. 5032
Sec. 18 from passage New section
Sec. 19 from passage New section
Sec. 20 July 1, 2026 29-1ll
Sec. 21 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 22 July 1, 2026 27-19d
Sec. 23 July 1, 2026 27-19e
Sec. 24 July 1, 2026 10a-174d
Sec. 25 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 26 July 1, 2026 12-18b(b)
Sec. 27 July 1, 2026 2-83
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Sections 8 to 11, inclusive, were deleted because no changes were made
to the funds included in those sections, and the remaining sections of
the bill were renumbered accordingly.
APP Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 61 of 61